Louisiana, session 2026, SB201.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 878.1(A) and (D) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 878.1. Hearing to determine parole eligibility for certain juvenile offenders
A.(1) If an offender is indicted on or after August 1, 2017, for the crime of
first degree murder (R.S. 14:30) where the offender was under the age of eighteen
years at the time of the commission of the offense, the district attorney may file a
notice of intent to seek a sentence of life imprisonment without possibility of parole
within one hundred eighty days after the indictment. If the district attorney timely
files the notice of intent, a hearing shall be conducted after conviction and prior to
sentencing to determine whether the sentence shall be imposed with or without
parole eligibility. If the court determines that the sentence shall be imposed with
parole eligibility, the offender shall be eligible for parole pursuant to the provisions
of R.S. 15:574.4(E). If the district attorney fails to timely file the notice of intent, the
sentence shall be imposed with parole eligibility and the offender shall be eligible
for parole pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 15:574.4(E) without the need of a
judicial determination pursuant to the provisions of this Article. If the court
determines that the sentence shall be imposed without parole eligibility, the offender
shall not be eligible for parole.
(2) If an offender is indicted on or after August 1, 2026, for the crime of
second degree murder (R.S. 14:30.1) where the offender was under the age of
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 201 ENROLLED
eighteen years at the time of the commission of the offense, the district attorney
may file a notice of intent to seek a sentence of life imprisonment without
possibility of parole within one hundred eighty days after the indictment. If the
district attorney timely files the notice of intent, a hearing shall be conducted
after conviction and prior to sentencing to determine whether the sentence shall
be imposed with or without parole eligibility. If the court determines that the
sentence shall be imposed with parole eligibility, the offender shall be eligible
for parole pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4(G). If the district attorney fails to timely
file the notice of intent, the sentence shall be imposed with parole eligibility and
the offender shall be eligible for parole pursuant to R.S. 15:574.4(G) without the
need of a judicial determination pursuant to this Article. If the court determines
that the sentence shall be imposed without parole eligibility, the offender shall
not be eligible for parole.
* * *
D. The sole purpose of the hearing is to determine whether the sentence shall
be imposed with or without parole eligibility. The court shall state for the record the
considerations taken into account and the factual basis for its determination.
Sentences imposed without parole eligibility and determinations that an offender is
not entitled to parole eligibility should normally be reserved for the worst offenders
and the worst cases. A reviewing court shall give paramount consideration to the
information considered by the trier of fact that rendered the original sentence.
In cases where a juvenile offender was originally sentenced to death after the
court considered but rejected youth as a mitigating factor, a reviewing court
shall not substitute its judgment for the judgment of the trier of fact unless the
trier of fact clearly abused its discretion and could not have reasonably reached
that result.
Section 2. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 15:574.4(G)(1) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§574.4. Parole; eligibility; juvenile offenders
* * *
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 201 ENROLLED
G.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person
serving a sentence of life imprisonment for a conviction of first degree murder (R.S.
14:30) or second degree murder (R.S. 14:30.1) who was under the age of eighteen
years at the time of the commission of the offense and whose indictment for the
offense was either prior to August 1, 2017, or on or after August 1, 2026, shall be
eligible for parole consideration pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection if a
judicial determination has been made that the person is entitled to parole eligibility
pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 878.1(A)(2) or (B) and all of the
following conditions have been met:
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.